District of Columbia statutes.
28-4517

Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-169, § 2, 27 DCR 5368
1981 Ed., § 28-4517.